Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2524
Bankruptcy petition; authorized.

A joint public agency may file a petition in the United States Bankruptcy Court under 11 U.S.C. chapter 9 and any acts amendatory thereto and supplementary thereof and may incur and pay the expenses incident to the consummation of a plan of adjustment of debts as contemplated by the petition.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 24.